Hawaii statutes.
§415A-8 Corporate name. The name of a
professional corporation:

(1) May be any name permitted by law expressly
applicable to the profession in which the corporation is engaged or by a rule
of the licensing authority of the profession; and

(2) Shall not be the same as, or substantially
identical to, the name of any domestic corporation, partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership
existing or registered under the laws of this State, or any foreign corporation,
partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, or limited
liability partnership authorized to transact business in this State, or any
trade name, trademark, or service mark registered in this State, or a name the
exclusive right to which is, at the time, reserved in this State, except that
this provision shall not apply if the applicant files with the director either
of the following:

(A) The written consent from the entity or
holder of a reserved or registered name to use and register the same or
substantially identical name, and one or more words are added by the applicant
to make the name distinguishable from the name on record; or

(B) A certified copy of a final decree of a
court of competent jurisdiction establishing the prior right of the applicant
to the use of the name in this State. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1; am L 1987, c
135, §114; am L 1996, c 92, §8; am L 1999, c 249, §14; am L 2000, c 219, §25;
am L 2001, c 129, §52; am L 2012, c 58, §11]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next